Nebraska, session 109, LB1126A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $675,000 from the 911 Service
System Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $1,350,000 from the 911 Service System Fund
for FY2027-28 to the Public Service Commission, for Program 583, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1126, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-